Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Operations of Department of Banking and Finance

Law reviews.

For note discussing the interrelationship between the International Banking Act, the provisions of the Financial Institutions Code relating to domestic banking, and the Foreign Corporations Chapter of the Corporation Code in the regulation of international banking in Georgia and comparing Georgia provisions with those of New York and California, see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 827 (1976).

7-1-60.
General scope of supervision.

Except where otherwise specifically provided, the department shall enforce and administer all laws of this state relating to financial institutions and shall exercise general supervision over financial institutions in accord with the underlying objectives of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 banking and finance legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1996).

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-61.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the objectives or provisions of this chapter. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the department is expressly authorized to make rules and regulations, consistent with this chapter, relating to organization, operations, and powers of financial institutions to:

Enable financial institutions existing under the laws of this state to compete fairly with financial institutions and others providing financial services in this state existing under the laws of the United States, other states, or foreign governments; or

Protect financial institutions jeopardized or challenged by new economic or technological conditions or by significant changes in the legal environment.

In the exercise of the discretion permitted by this Code section, the commissioner shall consider:

The ability of financial institutions to exercise any additional powers in a safe and sound manner;

The authority of any federally chartered bank, as the term “bank” is defined in Code Section 7-1-621, operating pursuant to federal law, regulation, or authoritative pronouncement;

The powers of other entities providing financial services in this state; and

Any specific limitations on financial institution operations or powers contained in this chapter.

Rules and regulations promulgated by the department may provide for controls, registration, or restrictions reasonably necessary to:

Prevent unfair or deceptive business practices which are prohibited under Code Section 10-1-393;

Prevent deceptive or misleading business practices by financial services providers which may occur by way of alternate delivery systems for the provision of financial products and services such as the Internet or other telecommunication capabilities; or

Prevent or control unfair or deceptive business practices which would operate to the detriment of any competing business or enterprise or to persons utilizing the services of any financial institution, its subsidiary, or affiliate.

All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” including the requirements for hearing as stated in that chapter. Regulations issued under this or other provisions of this chapter may make appropriate distinctions between types of financial institutions and may be amended, modified, or repealed from time to time.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1249, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 4/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 3/HB 184.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Investment securities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-4.

Borrowed money, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-9.

Public disclosure of information, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-11.

7-1-61.1.
Expansion of power for banks and credit unions; role of commissioner; documentation to legislative committees.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “power” means any banking or corporate power, right, benefit, privilege, or immunity of a financial institution, the deposits of which are federally insured, as set forth in any federal statute or any regulation, ruling, circular, bulletin, order, or interpretation issued by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union Administration, or Federal Reserve System.

To provide parity with financial institutions whose deposits are federally insured, the commissioner may, by specific order directed to a category of banks or credit unions, grant any power conferred upon a financial institution, subject to the supervision of the federal government, to:

State chartered banks and credit unions to enable such banks and credit unions to compete; and

Subsidiaries of state chartered banks and credit unions to the same extent powers are granted to subsidiaries of national banks or federal credit unions to enable such subsidiaries of state chartered banks and credit unions to compete.

No order provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be issued unless the commissioner determines that such activity will not present undue safety and soundness risks to the banks or credit unions involved. In making such determination, the commissioner shall consider the financial condition and regulatory safety and soundness ratings of the banks or credit unions affected and the ability of management to administer and supervise the activity. The department shall make any order issued pursuant to this Code section available for public review.

No later than ten days after the issuance of any order by the commissioner pursuant to this Code section, the commissioner shall provide a copy of such order to the chairpersons of the House Committee on Banks and Banking and Senate Banking and Financial Institutions Committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-61.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 4/HB 184; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 2/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, substituted “directed to a category” for “directed to an individual bank or credit union or category” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b); and added subsection (d). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-62.
Accounting procedures.

The department may promulgate regulations concerning the manner in which the books of financial institutions will be maintained in order to assist the department in its examinations and other supervisory activities, provided that, in all events:

A financial institution shall enter on its books a complete and accurate account of all of its assets, whether the assets are in its name or the name of others, at values which shall not, without the prior approval of the department, exceed the actual cost of the assets to the financial institution; and

A financial institution shall enter on its books a complete and accurate account of its liabilities, its borrowings, and the security interests it has granted and shall maintain additional accounts for losses and expenses.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of department to issue orders requiring financial institutions to open and keep such books as will allow the department to ascertain true conditions of financial institutions, §

7-1-91

.

7-1-63.
Retention of records.

The department shall issue regulations classifying records kept by financial institutions and prescribing the period, if any, for which records of each class shall be retained and the form in which such records shall be maintained. Such periods may be permanent or for a lesser term of years. In issuing such regulations, consideration shall be given to the objectives of this chapter and to:

Evidentiary effect in actions at law and administrative proceedings in which the production of records of financial institutions might be necessary or desirable;

State and federal statutes of limitation applicable to such actions or proceedings;

Availability of information contained in the records of the financial institution from other sources;

Requirements of electronic systems of transferring funds; and

Other pertinent matters;

so that financial institutions will be required to retain records for as short a period as is commensurate with interests of customers, shareholders, and the people of this state.

The regulations of the department shall not require financial institutions to maintain originals of checks or items for the payment of money or original computer tapes or original records with respect to accounts which have been inactive for a period of 12 successive months. Where a financial institution employs computers, its records may consist of legible products of computer operations.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, p. 70, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 45-47; Code 1933, § 41A-304, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 4; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 4/HB 24.

Cross references.

Hearsay rule exceptions, §

24-8-803

.

Self authentication, §

24-9-902

.

Public records, §

24-10-1005

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

7-1-64.
Department examinations and investigations; disclosure of information or prior notice regarding examinations of financial institutions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the department shall examine all financial institutions at least once each year and may examine or investigate any financial institution more frequently at any time it deems such action necessary or desirable. At least once annually the examination shall consist of a comprehensive review of the accounts, records, and affairs of the institution.

The department may, consistent with the objectives of this chapter and the purposes listed below, alter the examination frequency and scope as set out in subsection (a) of this Code section:

To achieve cooperation and coordination with other state and federal regulatory authorities including but not limited to examination programs of banks or bank holding companies having multistate operations;

To assure that appropriate time and attention are devoted to the supervision of troubled financial institutions; or

To minimize the examination burden on well-managed financial institutions which have consistently been operated with safe and sound banking practices.

In the case of a financial institution which is a member of the Federal Reserve System or whose deposits are insured by a public body of the United States, the department may accept, in lieu of any examination required by this Code section, examinations or reports thereof made pursuant to the Federal Reserve Act or statutes of the United States authorizing such insurance.

Employees of the department shall not divulge any information or provide prior notice, directly or indirectly, to any officer, director, agent, representative, or employee of a financial institution concerning the time or date of examination of the financial institution except in accordance with internal policy prescribed by the commissioner. Employees violating the policy of the commissioner relating to information or prior notice concerning examinations shall be subject to immediate dismissal.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 3, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 10; Ga. L. 1927, p. 344, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 13-401, 13-402, 25-122, 109-503; Ga. L. 1935, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 5; Ga. L. 1943, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 253, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 977, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1175, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 74, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 18, 19; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 6.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “are” was substituted for “is” in paragraph (b)(2).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Reserve Act, referred to in subsection (c) of this Code section, is codified generally throughout 12 U.S.C. See

12 U.S.C. § 226

.

7-1-65.
Examinations and investigations on request.

When requested in writing by the board of directors or holders of a majority of the shares of a financial institution, the department, at a time fixed by it, shall examine or investigate the affairs and condition of the financial institution. However, this provision shall not be construed to mean that such institution, directors, or shareholders shall have any greater right to require the department to disclose the results of such examination or investigation than they have in case of any examination or investigation at the insistence of the department nor shall the department be required under this Code section to make more than one examination per year of any financial institution.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-306, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-66.
Method of examination and investigations; special examiners; subpoenas.

Examinations and investigations shall be made by the commissioner or by qualified examiners or employees empowered in writing by the department to make examinations or investigations. The department may, when the occasion requires, appoint special examiners and prescribe their duties and powers.

Officials authorized to make examinations or investigations shall have the power and authority to administer oaths and to examine under oath any person (including any officer, director, agent, attorney, member, or employee of any financial institution) whose testimony may be relevant to the examination or investigation. Such officials shall have the authority and power to compel the appearance and attendance of any such person and the production by such person of pertinent books and papers, including books and papers to which the person has access because of his position with a financial institution, and for such purposes shall have the authority to issue a subpoena requiring the appearance and attendance of any such person or for the production of any pertinent books and papers.

If any person shall fail or refuse to obey an order or subpoena issued by the department, a court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application by the department, may issue an order requiring such person to appear before the court to show cause as to why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt and punished accordingly for refusal to obey the subpoena.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 18; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 20, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-318, 13-403, 13-9901; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 20; Code 1933, §§ 41A-307, 41A-9903, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 19; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 2/HB 143.

Cross references.

Authority of department to issue orders requiring financial institutions to submit records and affairs to legally conducted examinations or investigations by department, §

7-1-91

.

7-1-67.
Reports of examinations.

Any official who shall make an examination pursuant to this chapter shall reduce the result thereof to writing in such form as shall be prescribed by the department. Such report shall contain a full, true, and correct statement of the condition of the financial institution in the case of a comprehensive examination or of the matter subject to inquiry in the case of other examinations.

Each report shall be the property of the regulatory agency which generates such report; provided, however, that a copy of such report may be furnished to the examined financial institution for its internal, confidential use. A financial institution or any officer, director, or employee thereof shall not disclose a report or any portion of its contents. If a subpoena or discovery request is received for a report or any portion of its contents, the financial institution must deliver a copy of such subpoena or discovery request to the department immediately.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 3, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-404; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 21; Code 1933, § 41A-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 4.

7-1-68.
Reports to department; penalty for noncompliance.

The department may require reports on the condition of or any particular facts concerning any financial institution at any time the department deems it necessary or advisable.

The form of all reports, the information to be contained in them, and the date on which they shall be due shall be prescribed by the department. The reports shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the president, secretary, or other managing officer of the institution.

Any financial institution which fails to prepare any report in accordance with this Code section, or fails to provide any facts or information requested under subsection (a) of this Code section, shall pay the department a penalty of $100.00 for each day after the time fixed by the department for filing such report, but the department may, in its discretion, relieve any financial institution from the payment of such penalty, in whole or in part, if good cause be shown. If a financial institution fails to pay a penalty from which it has not been relieved, the department may, through the Attorney General, maintain an action at law to recover it.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 4, §§ 1, 2, 5; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 10; Ga. L. 1927, p. 344, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 13-501, 13-502, 25-122, 109-503; Ga. L. 1935, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1937, p. 425, § 1; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 5; Ga. L. 1943, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 977, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1175, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 74, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-309, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 5; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 2/HB 141; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-3/HB 811.

7-1-69.
Retention of reports.

The reports of examinations and investigations made by the department and reports made by financial institutions shall be preserved by the department for a period of five years, after which they may be destroyed.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 19; Code 1933, § 13-319; Code 1933, § 41A-310, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-70.
Disclosure of information.

Records of the department, regardless of the medium by which stored, are confidential. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, this chapter, or departmental rule or regulation, and, notwithstanding the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, such records shall not be open to inspection by or made available to the public. The commissioner and all other officials and employees of the department shall not disclose facts and information obtained in the course of their duties, including information obtained from examinations, investigations, and reports as required or authorized in this part. The department may, however, provide by rule, regulation, or order for public access to certain records which, in the opinion of the commissioner, do not contain sensitive information and from which disclosure the public would benefit.

Subject to the exceptions, safeguards, and limitations contained in subsection (c) of this Code section, the restrictions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to disclosures:

Within the department or made to the Governor in the course of official duties;

Required by law, including disclosures required by subpoena or other legal process of a court or administrative agency having competent jurisdiction in legal proceedings and, where applicable, when the financial institution is a party or where the information is not otherwise available upon direct subpoena of a financial institution;

In prosecutions or other court actions to which the department or the commissioner is a party;

Made to federal or state financial institution supervisory agencies, other federal or state regulatory agencies with legal authority over such institution, the United States Department of Justice (including the Federal Bureau of Investigation), the United States Department of the Treasury, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, or state or local law enforcement authorities;

Made to any officer, attorney, or director of the involved financial institution, made to any officer, attorney, or director of the involved financial institution’s holding company, or with the written consent of said financial institution or holding company;

Made in a publication of the department which is available to the general public;

Of general economic and similar data considered by the department in regard to requests for new articles, new branches, changes in the location of facilities, or similar matters made to parties interested in the department’s action in regard thereto; and

Made to a financial institution concerning the past job performance of a prospective employee with the written consent of such prospective employee, provided such written consent shall not be required in circumstances provided for in Code Section 7-1-840.

The following exceptions, safeguards, and limitations shall apply:

Disclosures made under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be made, where appropriate, under safeguards designed to prevent further dissemination of confidential data; provided, however, that for disclosures of suspected criminal activity made under paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the confidentiality safeguards already in place within those agencies shall be considered adequate. Except for disclosures under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the department shall not be required to make authorized disclosures where it deems such disclosures undesirable;

All disclosures shall be limited to only those documents directly relevant to the inquiry or legal dispute at issue; and

The documents listed below shall be considered absolutely privileged and confidential and shall be exempt from open inspection and not subject to disclosure by the department without a specific order of court pursuant to Code Section 7-1-90, which order specifically holds the public interest in the safety and soundness of the banking system and its regulation to be outweighed by other interests of justice. Such exempt documents shall include:

Departmental internal investigations, documents, and notes which reflect the deliberative processes of employees;

Opinions provided in confidence to the department regarding proposed new banks;

Informal notes and memos of the department that are not purely factual in nature;

Advisory opinions;

Recommendations, summaries, and analyses that are utilized for departmental internal purposes and are not final orders or reports; and

Other similar materials or notes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, the commissioner may, without waiving any privilege, authorize access to confidential supervisory information for any appropriate governmental, law enforcement, or other public purpose.

Violation of this Code section shall be grounds for removal from office.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-311, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 2.

7-1-71.
Removal of officers, directors, or employees.

The department, by order of the commissioner, shall have the right to require the immediate suspension from office of any director, officer, or employee of any financial institution and to prohibit any such person’s participation in the affairs of any financial institution if the department finds such person:

To be dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of the affairs of the financial institution;

To have persistently violated the laws of this state;

To have violated the lawful orders, regulations, or conditions of a written agreement of or with the department;

To have been indicted for any crime involving moral turpitude or breach of trust;

To have evidenced an inability to conduct his or her own financial affairs or the affairs of a company in which such individual owns a majority interest or has responsibility for financial matters, in a fiscally responsible, diligent, or lawful fashion; or

To have engaged in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with any insured depository institution or to have demonstrated willful or continuing disregard for the safety and soundness of a financial institution.

A prohibition order, which prohibits an individual from participating in any capacity in the affairs of a financial institution, may be issued by the commissioner in connection with a suspension order issued under the authority of this Code section. Such prohibition order may provide that if an officer, director, or employee has been removed from office temporarily or permanently at a financial institution, he or she may also be prohibited from participating in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of any financial institution or any financial institution’s affiliate regulated by the department during the time the prohibition order is in effect.

The department shall serve written notice upon the party of its determination to suspend such person from office or prohibit such person from participating in the affairs of a financial institution pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. A suspension order or a prohibition order shall be effective upon such service and shall specify whether the suspension is temporary, the duration and terms of the suspension if temporary, or if it is permanent. The prohibition order shall be consistent in duration with the suspension order.

Any person suspended or prohibited under this Code section may request his or her reinstatement in writing delivered to the department within ten days of his or her suspension or prohibition. If such reinstatement is not requested, the director, officer, or employee shall be considered permanently removed and, if so ordered, permanently prohibited from participation in the affairs of any financial institution.

Upon request for reinstatement, the department shall conduct an internal review of the matter during which such person has the opportunity to state his or her case to the commissioner. The department shall deliver the findings of the hearing to such person. If the person requests further review, the department may refer the matter to the Office of State Administrative Hearings under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” where a nonpublic hearing shall be held to review the department’s decision. The final decision of the department shall be conclusive, except as it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90.

Any order issued pursuant to this Code section shall also be delivered to the financial institution with which the party was associated at the time such order was issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 5, § 3; Code 1933, § 13-603; Code 1933, § 41A-312, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 9; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 5/SB 82; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 7/SB 465; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 3/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “or any financial institution’s affiliate regulated by the department” near the end of the second sentence of subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-72.
Regulation of persons performing services for financial institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary and consistent with the objectives of this chapter as set forth in Code Section 7-1-3 and subject to the procedures provided in regulations of the department, a financial institution may provide financial services to its customers either directly or through employment of duly licensed persons, provided that such financial institution or its licensed employee or agent has qualified under other laws otherwise applicable to other providers of such financial services.

Where financial services are being performed by a person or corporation for a financial institution, such person or corporation shall be subject to:

Examination and investigation by the department to the same extent as if the services were performed by the financial institution on its own premises;

Regulation by the department in regard to such services to the same extent as if such services were being performed by the financial institution for its own internal benefit or as an extension of the range of financial services products offered to customers of the financial institution; and

All enforcement proceedings made available to the department in this title.

In the event of conflicting statutory responsibilities, except as otherwise provided by law, the department shall not grant licenses to providers of financial services to or through financial institutions. The department shall be the responsible authority in reviewing, authorizing, or otherwise regulating, consistent with this chapter, the contractual relationship entered into by financial institutions for the provision of such services or incidental to application for further licensing.

For purposes of this Code section, “financial services” shall include, but is not limited to, business and consumer financial record keeping, investments, planning and advisory assistance, surety, brokerage, data processing, electronic fund transfers, information services, and protective services performed for a financial institution which are normally performed by the financial institution for its own benefit or provided to the customers of the financial institution incidental to its conduct of the banking business. The department may further define “financial services” to include other activities of a financial nature which it determines to be consistent with the safe and sound operation of a banking business, not otherwise in violation of this chapter, and in the public interest.

The department may, by regulation, prescribe fees to be paid for examinations of a person or corporation that performs financial services for a financial institution.

Notwithstanding Code Section 7-1-70, the department may furnish a copy of any report of a financial service provider prepared by the department to the financial institution serviced by the financial service provider.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-411, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-313, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 3/HB 143.

7-1-73.
Regulation of affiliates.

The department may examine or investigate any affiliate of a financial institution for the purpose of determining the condition of the financial institution to the same extent and in the same manner as it may examine or investigate the financial institution itself.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-411, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-314, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 8.

7-1-74.
Annual report of department.

For each calendar year the department shall compile and publish in print or electronically an annual report in such form and containing such information as it may determine necessary to summarize reasonably its operations. The report may contain recommendations which the department may have for changes in the laws governing financial institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, §§ 15, 16, 17; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 28; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-315, 13-316, 13-317; Code 1933, § 41A-315, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 8; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

7-1-75.
Discretion of department.

Whenever in this chapter the department is authorized but not required to take any action, the taking of such action shall be within the discretion of the commissioner or his duly authorized deputy. The department shall not be required to grant opportunity for hearing except where such hearing is specifically required by this chapter or Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The department shall maintain accurate memoranda or transcripts of all hearings conducted by the department pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-316, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-76.
Department may act after time limit without resubmittal; withdrawal of applications and requests; imposition of conditions; nullification.

Failure of the department to act within any of the time limits established by this chapter or regulations issued pursuant thereto shall not deprive the department of jurisdiction thereafter to act in regard to the matter involved without need for resubmittal of any application, request, or similar action.

Any action, application, or request requiring department approval under this chapter may be withdrawn by the applicant prior to department action thereon without prejudice to the applicant’s right to resubmit such application at a later date. If such application has been forwarded to the department through the Secretary of State, the department shall notify the Secretary of State of any such withdrawal and that the application or request is no longer pending.

The department may impose conditions on any approval, including but not limited to conditions designed to address competitive, financial, managerial, safety and soundness, convenience and needs, compliance, and other concerns, to ensure that such approval is consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The department may nullify a decision on any request, action, or application if:

The department becomes aware of any material misrepresentation or omission by the applicant;

The department is not promptly informed by the applicant of a subsequent material change in circumstances;

The decision is contrary to law, regulation, or departmental policy; or

The decision was granted due to clerical or administrative error or was based on a material mistake of law or fact.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-317, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 7.

7-1-77.
Approval by commissioner of state rules and regulations affecting financial institutions.

Any rule, regulation, order, or administrative directive issued by a state official, agency, or entity which is intended to be applicable to banks, banking associations, bank holding companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, or companies engaged in selling money orders or any other company or financial institution under the supervision of the commissioner and required to report to the commissioner or subject to rules and regulations issued by the commissioner shall be effective as to any such company or financial institution only after the rule, regulation, order, or other directive has been approved in writing by the commissioner. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to modify, limit, or otherwise restrict the authority of the department to conduct an examination, bring a civil or administrative action, or otherwise enforce state or federal laws against a financial institution.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-318, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 950, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-3/HB 811.

7-1-78.
Agreements with other supervisory or regulatory authorities.

The department may, at its discretion, enter into cooperative or reciprocal agreements with other supervisory or regulatory authorities or law enforcement and may furnish to such entities information contained in the examinations, reports, and institution files, provided that the information is to be used for confidential, regulatory purposes.

Furnishing information as permitted by this Code section shall not be deemed to change the confidential character of the information furnished.

The department may accept reports of examination and other records from such entities in lieu of conducting its own examination.

Any examination reports, reports of investigation, or other information obtained from such entities shall be deemed the property of the providing entity and not available for public review. Any requests for such information shall be made to the providing entity.

The department may take such actions as are reasonably necessary, either independently or with such entities, to facilitate the regulation of financial services providers doing business in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 5/HB 184.

7-1-79.
Discretionary expedited approval process; considerations.

The department may determine that formal approvals for certain transactions or activities to be conducted by its regulated entities are not necessary but may be replaced by a discretionary expedited approval process to begin with written notice to the department by the entity which describes the transaction or activity in a form and with a specificity acceptable to the department. For such instances, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the authority provided to it in this chapter.

In the exercise of the discretion permitted by this Code section, the commissioner shall consider:

Whether the transaction or activity poses unacceptable safety and soundness risks;

Whether the transaction or activity is warranted only for financially strong and well-managed institutions, as such institutions are further defined in department regulations;

Whether the transaction or activity is necessary to reduce the burden on financial institutions or other entities which the department regulates;

Whether the transaction or activity will assist regulated entities in remaining competitive and responsive to both economic and consumer demands; and

Whether the transaction or activity is consistent with the objectives of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 9.